test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maeaeqdwltwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mǟʼdõltõks: # Noun 208 'eng /est mälestus/fin' - full paradigm
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Sg+Nom: [mǟʼdõltõks, mǟdõltõks]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Sg+Gen: [mǟʼdõltõks, mǟdõltõks]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Sg+Par: [mǟʼdõltõkst, mǟdõltõkst]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Sg+Dat: [mǟʼdõltõksõn, mǟdõltõksõn]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Sg+Ins: [mǟʼdõltõksõks, mǟdõltõksõks]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Sg+Ill: [mǟʼdõltõksõ, mǟdõltõksõ]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Sg+Ela: [mǟʼdõltõksõst, mǟdõltõksõst]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Pl+Nom: [mǟʼdõltõkst, mǟdõltõkst]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Pl+Gen: [mǟʼdõltõkst, mǟdõltõkst]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Pl+Par: [mǟʼdõltõkši, mǟdõltõkši]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Pl+Dat: [mǟʼdõltõkstõn, mǟdõltõkstõn]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Pl+Ins: [mǟʼdõltõkstõks, mǟdõltõkstõks]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Pl+Ill: [mǟʼdõltõkšiz, mǟdõltõkšiz]
     mǟʼdõltõks+N+Pl+Ela: [mǟʼdõltõkšist, mǟdõltõkšist]
